District of Columbia statutes.
2-1401.01

Intent of Council.

It is the intent of the Council of the District of Columbia, in enacting this chapter, to secure an end in the District of Columbia to discrimination for any reason other than that of individual merit, including, but not limited to, discrimination by reason of race, color, religion, national origin, sex, age, marital status, personal appearance, sexual orientation, gender identity or expression, familial status, family responsibilities, matriculation, political affiliation, genetic information, disability, source of income, status as a victim of an intrafamily offense, and place of residence or business.

Dec. 13, 1977, D.C. Law 2-38, title I, § 101, 24 DCR 6038
June 28, 1994, D.C. Law 10-129, § 2(a), 41 DCR 2583
Apr. 20, 1999, D.C. Law 12-242,§ 2(a), 46 DCR 952
Apr. 5, 2005, D.C. Law 15-263, § 2(a), 52 DCR 237
Mar. 8, 2006, D.C. Law 16-58, § 2(a), 53 DCR 14
Mar. 14, 2007, D.C. Law 16-273, § 3(a), 54 DCR 859

Repeal of Law 12-138

Section 153 of Pub. L. 105-277, 112 Stat. 2681-146, the Omnibus Consolidated and Emergency Supplemental Appropriations Act, 1999, provided that D.C. Law 12-138 is repealed October 21, 1998.

Establishment of Department of Human Rights and Minority Business Development: See Mayor’s Order 89-247, November 1, 1989.

Uniform Language in D.C. Government Anti-Discrimination Issuances and Equal Employment Opportunity Notices, see Mayor’s Order 2002-149, September 13, 2002 ( 49 DCR 8613).

Amendment of M.O. 2002-149, dated 8-26-02 — Uniform Language in D.C. Government Anti-Discrimination Issuances and Equal Employment Opportunity Notices, see Mayor’s Order 2002-175, November 1, 2002 ( 49 DCR 9883).

Sexual Harassment, see Mayor’s Order 2004-171, October 20, 2004 ( 51 DCR 10486).

Amendment of Mayor’s Order 2002-175, dated October 23, 2002 Uniform Language in D.C. Government Anti-Discrimination Issuances and Equal Employment Opportunity Notices, see Mayor’s Order 2006-151, November 6, 2006 ( 53 DCR 9351).

Residency requirement for District employees: Section 2 of D.C. Law 12-138, repealed by § 153 of Pub. L. 105-277, had amended §§ 1-608.1 and 1-609.1 1-608.01 and 1-608.01a, 2001 Ed., and enacted § 1-607.51, to require newly-hired District employees in the Career Service, Excepted Service, and Educational Service to establish and maintain residency in the District within 180 days of being hired, and to allow the Mayor to exempt hard to fill positions from the requirements of the act.
D.C. Law 16-273 inserted “status as a victim of an intrafamily offense,” following “source of income,”.
D.C. Law 16-58 substituted “sexual orientation, gender identity or expression,” for “sexual orientation,”.
D.C. Law 15-263 substituted “genetic information, disability,” for “disability,”.
1973 Ed., § 6-2201.
1981 Ed., § 1-2501.
This section is referenced in § 1-608.01, § 1-608.01a, § 1-608.59, § 1-632.06, § 2-1403.01, § 2-1431.01, § 2-1535.01, § 4-754.21, § 22-3312.02, and § 50-325.